North Carolina, session 2025, HB1027.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-58.1, as amended by Section 1 of S.L. 2025-14, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 160A-58.1. Petition for annexation; standards.
…
(b) A noncontiguous area proposed for annexation must meet all of the following
standards:
…
(5) The area within the proposed satellite corporate limits, when added to the area
within all other satellite corporate limits, may not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the area within the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.
This subdivision does not apply to the Cities of Archdale, Asheboro,
Belmont, Claremont, Concord, Conover, Dunn, Durham, Elizabeth City,
Gastonia, Greenville, Hickory, Kannapolis, Kings Mountain, Locust, Lowell,
Marion, Mount Airy, Mount Holly, New Bern, Newton, Oxford, Randleman,
Roanoke Rapids, Rockingham, Saluda, Sanford, Salisbury, Shelby, Southport,
Statesville, and Washington and the Towns of Ahoskie, Angier, Apex, Ayden,
Belville, Benson, Bladenboro, Bridgeton, Bunn, Burgaw, Calabash, Carthage,
Catawba, China Grove, Clayton, Columbia, Columbus, Cramerton, Creswell,
Dallas, Dobson, Erwin, Four Oaks, Franklin, Franklinton, Franklinville,
Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Godwin, Goldston, Granite Quarry, Green Level,
Grimesland, Harrisburg, Holly Ridge, Holly Springs, Hookerton, Hope Mills,
Huntersville, Jamestown, Kenansville, Kenly, Knightdale, Landis, Laurel
Park, Liberty, Lillington, Louisburg, Madison, Maggie Valley, Maiden,
Mayodan, Maysville, Middlesex, Midland, Mocksville, Morrisville, Mount
Pleasant, Nashville, North Wilkesboro, Norwood, Oak Island, Oakboro,
Ocean Isle Beach, Pembroke, Pine Level, Pollocksville, Princeton, Ramseur,
Ranlo, Richlands, Rockwell, Rolesville, Rutherfordton, Shallotte, Siler City,
Smithfield, Spencer, Spring Lake, Stanley, Stem, Stovall, Surf City,
Swansboro, Taylorsville, Troutman, Troy, Vass, Wallace, Warsaw, Watha,
Waynesville, Weldon, Wendell, West Jefferson, Wilson's Mills, Windsor,
Wingate, Yadkinville, Youngsville, and Zebulon.
…."
*H1027-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1027-Second Edition